Arkansas, session 2025, HB1877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-27-302, concerning definitions with
respect to the Arkansas Protection of Children Against Exploitation Act of
1979, is amended to add additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(6) "Computer generated" means produced, adapted, or modified,
in whole or in part, through the use of artificial intelligence;
(7)(A) "Indistinguishable" means a visual or print medium that
is such that an ordinary person viewing the visual or print medium would
conclude that the visual or print medium depicts an actual child engaged in
*CEB249*
04-09-2025 18:45:17 CEB249

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 S4/9/25 HB1877
the conduct depicted.
(B) "Indistinguishable" does not include a visual or print
medium that depicts a child that is a drawing, cartoon, sculpture, or
painting; and
(8) "Adversarial testing" means red teaming or another activity
or exercise conducted in a controlled environment and in collaboration with
an artificial intelligence developer to identify a potential adverse behavior
or outcome of a model or system, to determine how the potential adverse
behavior or outcome of a model or system could occur, to stress test
safeguards, and to conduct other structured evaluation methods as set forth
by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-27-304(a), concerning the offense of
pandering or possessing visual or print medium depicting sexually explicit
conduct involving a child, is amended to read as follows:
(a) With knowledge of the character of the visual or print medium
involved, no person shall do any of the following:
(1) Knowingly advertise for sale or distribution, sell,
distribute, transport, ship, exhibit, display, or receive for the purpose of
sale or distribution any visual or print medium depicting a child
participating or engaging in sexually explicit conduct or that is
indistinguishable from the image of a child participating or engaging in
sexually explicit conduct, including without limitation a visual or print
medium that is computer generated; or
(2) Knowingly solicit, receive, purchase, exchange, possess,
view, distribute, or control any visual or print medium depicting a child
participating or engaging in sexually explicit conduct or that is
indistinguishable from the image of a child participating or engaging in
sexually explicit conduct, including without limitation a visual or print
medium that is computer generated.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-27-304, concerning the offense of
pandering or possessing visual or print medium depicting sexually explicit
conduct involving a child, is amended to add an additional subsection to read
as follows:
(c) This section does not apply to:
04-09-2025 18:45:17 CEB249

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 S4/9/25 HB1877
(1) A visual or print medium possessed, controlled, or
intentionally viewed as part of a law enforcement investigation; or
(2)(A) An interactive computer service as defined in 47 U.S.C. §
230 for:
(i) Content provided by another party; and
(ii) Computer generated visual or print medium
depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child when the visual or
print medium is generated as part of adversarial testing conducted in good
faith to prevent, detect, or mitigate the risk of artificial intelligence
systems generating visual or print medium depicting sexually explicit conduct
involving a child.
(B) Subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section does not include
a person who engages in adversarial testing for personal or exploitative
purposes or for purposes unrelated to legitimate artificial intelligence
safety testing.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 5-27-601(13) is repealed.
(13) “Reproduction” includes, but is not limited to, a computer-
generated image;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 5-27-601, concerning definitions with
respect to computer crimes against minors, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(16) "Computer generated image" means a picture or video
produced, adapted, or modified, in part or in whole, through the use of
artificial intelligence;
(17)(A) "Indistinguishable" means that a depiction is such that
an ordinary person viewing the depiction would conclude that it is a
depiction of an actual child engaged in the conduct depicted.
(B) "Indistinguishable" does not include a depiction of a
child that is a drawing, cartoon sculpture, or painting; and
(18) "Adversarial testing" means red teaming or another activity
or exercise conducted in a controlled environment and in collaboration with
an artificial intelligence developer to identify a potential adverse behavior
or outcome of a model or system, to determine how the potential adverse
behavior or outcome of a model or system could occur, to stress test
04-09-2025 18:45:17 CEB249

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 S4/9/25 HB1877
safeguards, and to conduct other structured evaluation methods as set forth
by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 5-27-602(a), concerning the offense of
distributing, possessing, or viewing matter depicting sexually explicit
conduct involving a child, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A person commits distributing, possessing, or viewing of matter
depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child if the person
knowingly:
(1) Receives for the purpose of selling or knowingly sells,
procures, manufactures, gives, provides, lends, trades, mails, delivers,
transfers, publishes, distributes, circulates, disseminates, presents,
exhibits, advertises, offers, or agrees to offer through any means, including
the internet, any photograph, film, videotape, computer program or file,
video game, computer generated image, or any other reproduction or
reconstruction that depicts a child or incorporates the image of a child
engaging in sexually explicit conduct or is indistinguishable from the image
of a child engaging in sexually explicit conduct, whether made or produced by
electronic, mechanical, or other means; or
(2) Possesses or views through any means, including on the
internet, any photograph, film, videotape, computer program or file,
computer-generated computer generated image, video game, or any other
reproduction that depicts a child or incorporates the image of a child
engaging in sexually explicit conduct or is indistinguishable from the image
of a child engaging in sexually explicit conduct, including those made or
produced by electronic, mechanical, or other means.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 5-27-602, concerning distributing,
possessing, or viewing of matter depicting sexually explicit conduct
involving a child, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(d) This section does not apply to:
(1) Matter depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child
possessed, controlled, or intentionally viewed as part of a law enforcement
investigation; or
(2)(A) An interactive computer service as defined in 47 U.S.C. §
04-09-2025 18:45:17 CEB249

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 S4/9/25 HB1877
230 for:
(i) Content provided by another party; or
(ii) Computer generated matter depicting sexually
explicit conduct involving a child when the matter is generated as part of
adversarial testing conducted in good faith to prevent, detect, or mitigate
the risk of artificial intelligence systems generating matter depicting
sexually explicit conduct involving a child.
(B) Subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section does not include
a person who engages in adversarial testing for personal or exploitative
purposes or for purposes unrelated to legitimate artificial intelligence
safety testing.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 5-27-603 is amended to read as follows:
5-27-603. Possession or use of child sexual abuse material Electronic
facilitation of child sexual abuse.
(a) A person commits possession or use of child sexual abuse material
electronic facilitation of child sexual abuse if the person knowingly:
(1) Compiles, enters into, or transmits by means of computer,
makes, prints, publishes, or reproduces by other computerized means,
knowingly causes or allows to be entered into or transmitted by means of
computer or buys, sells, receives, exchanges, or disseminates any notice,
statement, or advertisement or any child's name, telephone number, place of
residence, physical characteristics, or other descriptive or identifying
information for purposes of facilitating, encouraging, offering, or
soliciting sexually explicit conduct of or with any child or another
individual believed by the person to be a child, or the visual depiction of
the conduct including a visual depiction that is a computer generated image
of sexually explicit conduct with any child or another individual believed by
the person to be a child or that is indistinguishable from the image of a
child; or
(2) Utilizes an online computer service, internet service, or
local bulletin board service to seduce, solicit, lure, or entice or attempt
to seduce, solicit, lure, or entice a child or another individual believed by
the person to be a child, to engage in sexually explicit conduct.
(b) Possession or use of child sexual abuse material Electronic
facilitation of child sexual abuse is a Class B felony.
04-09-2025 18:45:17 CEB249

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 S4/9/25 HB1877

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 5-27-609(a)(2)(A), concerning the
definition of sexually explicit digital material with respect to the offense
of possession of sexually explicit digital material, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) “Sexually explicit digital material” means any
photograph, digitized impact, or visual depiction of a minor or a computer
generated image that is that is indistinguishable from a depiction of a
minor:
(i) In any condition of nudity; or
(ii) Involved in any prohibited sexual act.

/s/S. Meeks























04-09-2025 18:45:17 CEB249